Florida, session 2026, SB1634.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 18 943.03102, Florida Statutes, as created by SB 1632, 2026 Regular 19 Session, is amended to read: 20 943.03102âDesignation of terrorist organizations.â 21 (2)(a)1.âAt least 7 days before making a designation under 22 subsection (1), the Chief of Domestic Security shall provide 23 written notice to the Governor and Cabinet of his or her intent 24 to designate an organization as a foreign terrorist organization 25 or a domestic terrorist organization, which notice must be 26 accompanied by written findings regarding the basis for such 27 designation. 28 2.a.âAny information held by the Chief of Domestic Security 29 and any information in the notification by the Chief of Domestic 30 Security to the Governor and Cabinet which would reveal 31 information critical to state or national security is exempt 32 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 33 Constitution. 34 b.âAny portion of a meeting which would reveal information 35 made exempt under sub-subparagraph a. is exempt from s. 286.011 36 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the State Constitution. 37 c.âThis subparagraph is subject to the Open Government 38 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 39 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 40 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 41 Section 2.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 42 necessity that any information held by the Chief of Domestic 43 Security and any information in the notification of the intent 44 to designate an organization as a domestic terrorist 45 organization or a foreign terrorist organization by the Chief of 46 Domestic Security to the Governor and Cabinet which would reveal 47 information critical to state or national security be made 48 exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 49 Article I of the State Constitution. Such information is 50 critical for the security interests of this state and of the 51 United States, and the release of such information could 52 endanger or do irreparable harm to the interests of this state 53 and of the United States. 54 (2)âFurther, the Legislature finds that it is a public 55 necessity that any portion of a meeting which would reveal such 56 information be made exempt from s. 286.011, Florida Statutes, 57 and s. 24(b), Article I of the State Constitution for the same 58 reasons. 59 (3)âConsequently, the Legislature finds that it is a public 60 necessity to exempt such information from public records and 61 public meetings requirements to safeguard information critical 62 to state or national security and to safeguard the interests of 63 this state and of the United States. 64 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 65 SB 1632 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 66 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 67 thereof and becomes a law.